District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-4708

Destroying stolen property

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(y)-(gg), 29 DCR 3976

History

1981 Ed., §§ 22-2201 to 22-2208.

Prior Codifications

Former § 22-2202, 1981 Ed., had been amended by D.C. Law 4-202.

Editor's Notes